Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.070

Qualifications for licensure or certification.

(1) The secretary shall issue a massage therapist's license to an applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a) Effective June 1, 1988, successful completion of a course of study in an approved massage program, transfer program, or approved apprenticeship program;

(b) Successful completion of an examination administered or approved by the board; and

(c) Be eighteen years of age or older.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2013, the secretary shall issue a reflexologist certification to an applicant who completes an application form that identifies the name and address of the applicant and the certification request, and demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a) Successful completion of a course of study in reflexologist program approved by the secretary;

(b) Successful completion of an examination administered or approved by the secretary; and

(c) Be eighteen years of age or older.

(3) Applicants for a massage therapist's license or for certification as a reflexologist shall be subject to the grounds for denial or issuance of a conditional credential under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(4) The secretary may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the massage therapist or reflexologist applicant meets the criteria for licensure provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the criteria.

[ 2016 c 53 s 3; 2016 c 41 s 6; 2012 c 137 s 10; 1991 c 3 s 257; 1987 c 443 s 7; 1975 1st ex.s. c 280 s 7.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2016 c 41 s 6 and by 2016 c 53 s 3, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.